Utah statutes.
71-7-2.   Political subdivisions may provide proper burial sites.
For the purpose of giving effect to this act, cities, towns, counties or other
political subdivisions of the state of Utah may grant burial sites to
chartered veterans' organizations without financial consideration therefor, or
may provide a proper site for the burial of any persons covered by this act
without financial consideration.
